Maryland, session 2025, HB1190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
2–201.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING TERMS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1190*

HOUSE BILL 1190
(2) “CHILD” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–8A–01 OF THE
COURTS ARTICLE.
(3) “PRINCIPAL IN THE FIRST DEGREE” MEANS A PERSON WHO IS THE
MAIN ACTOR IN A CRIME OR HELPS OTHERS COMMIT A CRIME.
(B) A murder is in the first degree if it is:
(1) a deliberate, premeditated, and willful killing;
(2) committed by lying in wait;
(3) committed by poison; or
(4) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, committed in the
perpetration of or an attempt to perpetrate:
(i) arson in the first degree;
(ii) burning a barn, stable, tobacco house, warehouse, or other
outbuilding that:
1. is not parcel to a dwelling; and
2. contains cattle, goods, wares, merchandise, horses, grain,
hay, or tobacco;
(iii) burglary in the first, second, or third degree;
(iv) carjacking or armed carjacking;
(v) escape in the first degree from a State correctional facility or a
local correctional facility;
(vi) kidnapping under § 3–502 or § 3–503(a)(2) of this article;
(vii) mayhem;
(viii) rape;
(ix) robbery under § 3–402 or § 3–403 of this article;
(x) sexual offense in the first or second degree;
(xi) sodomy as that crime existed before October 1, 2020; or

HOUSE BILL 1190 3
(xii) a violation of § 4–503 of this article concerning destructive
devices.
(C) A PERSON WHO WAS A CHILD AT THE TIME OF THE OFFENSE MAY NOT
BE FOUND TO HAVE COMMITTED MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(4) OF THIS SECTION UNLESS THE PERSON WAS A PRINCIPAL IN THE
FIRST DEGREE.
[(b)] (D) (1) A person who commits a murder in the first degree is guilty of a
felony and on conviction shall be sentenced to:
(i) imprisonment for life without the possibility of parole; or
(ii) imprisonment for life.
(2) Unless a sentence of imprisonment for life without the possibility of
parole is imposed in compliance with § 2–203 of this subtitle and § 2–304 of this title, the
sentence shall be imprisonment for life.
[(c)] (E) A person who solicits another or conspires with another to commit
murder in the first degree is guilty of murder in the first degree if the death of another
occurs as a result of the solicitation or conspiracy.
(F) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A PERSON
CONVICTED ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30, 2025, OF MURDER IN THE FIRST
DEGREE UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(4) OF THIS SECTION WHO WAS A CHILD AT THE
TIME OF THE OFFENSE AND NOT A PRINCIPAL IN THE FIRST DEGREE MAY FILE A
MOTION FOR REVIEW OF CONVICTION AT ANY TIME WHILE INCARCERATED OR
UNDER SUPERVISION.
(2) (I) ON THE FILING OF A MOTION FOR REVIEW OF CONVICTION
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COURT SHALL HOLD A HEARING
TO DETERMINE, AFTER CONSIDERATION OF ALL THE EVIDENCE, WHETHER THE
MOVING PARTY COULD BE FOUND GUILTY OF MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE ON OR
AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2025.
(II) IF THE COURT DOES NOT FIND THAT THERE IS A
SUBSTANTIAL OR SIGNIFICANT POSSIBILITY THAT THE MOVING PARTY COULD BE
FOUND GUILTY OF MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2025,
THE COURT MAY VACATE THE CONVICTION AND GRANT A NEW TRIAL, OR
RESENTENCE AS TO ANY MERGED CONVICTION, AS THE COURT CONSIDERS
APPROPRIATE.
(3) IF THE COURT RESENTENCES A MOVING PARTY UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COURT MAY NOT INCREASE THE SENTENCE OF A MOVING PARTY.

HOUSE BILL 1190
(4) THE COURT SHALL NOTIFY THE STATE’S ATTORNEY OF THE
FILING OF A MOTION FOR REVIEW OF CONVICTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
2–204.
(a) A murder that is not in the first degree under § 2–201 of this subtitle is in the
second degree.
(b) A person who commits a murder in the second degree is guilty of a felony and
on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 40 years.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.